Maine, session 132, LD808.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6558 is enacted to read:
§6558. Wearable panic alert systems
Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a school board or a governing body of an
approved private school shall implement at each school building a wearable panic alert
system. As used in this section, "wearable panic alert system" means a collection of
networked wearable devices that can transmit 9-1-1 calls and other notifications or
otherwise allow for immediate contact with local emergency response agencies.
1. Systems integration. A wearable panic alert system must be capable of integrating
with local public safety answering point infrastructure to transmit a 9-1-1 call and initiating
a campuswide lockdown notification.
2. Device distribution. A school board or a governing body of an approved private
school shall provide each staff person in a school building with a wearable panic alert
system device.
3. Training. Prior to the first day of school each year, a school board or a governing
body of an approved private school shall ensure that each staff person in a school building
receives training on the protocol for and appropriate use of a wearable panic alert system
device.
4. Security data accessibility. A school board or a governing body of an approved
private school shall ensure that all security data within a school building are accessible by
a local law enforcement agency and coordinate with the local law enforcement agency to
establish appropriate access protocols. Accessible security data must include access to data
from cameras and maps.
5. Records. This subsection applies to records related to physical security and fire
safety of school buildings.
A. Any records, information, photographs, audio and visual presentations, schematic
diagrams, surveys, recommendations or consultations or portions thereof relating
directly to the physical security or fire safety of a school building or revealing security
or fire safety systems that are accessed or held by a local law enforcement agency under
this section are confidential and are not public records pursuant to Title 1, chapter 13,
subchapter 1.
B. Information made confidential under paragraph A may be disclosed:
(1) To the property owner or leaseholder of the school building;
(2) In furtherance of the official duties and responsibilities of the local law
enforcement agency holding the information;
(3) To a local, state or federal agency in furtherance of that agency's official duties
and responsibilities; and
(4) Upon a showing of good cause before a court of competent jurisdiction.
6. Rules. The department may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Page 1 - 132LR1419(01)